Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5196XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 2036 Section 1. Section 321.383, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. Except as provided in paragraph 3 âbâ , a pilot car shall accompany an implement of husbandry 4 being operated on a highway if the width of the implement 5 of husbandry exceeds twenty-two feet or if any part of the 6 implement of husbandry extends over or beyond the center of the 7 roadway. 8 (1) A pilot car shall lead an implement of husbandry being 9 operated on a two-lane highway with only one lane in each 10 direction of travel. 11 (2) A pilot car shall follow an implement of husbandry being 12 operated on a highway with more than one lane in each direction 13 of travel or with three lanes. 14 b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply to an implement of husbandry 15 being operated for one mile or less on a primary road, 16 farm-to-market road, or paved secondary road. 17